New York, session 2025-2026, A9408.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 4 of section 911 of the execu- 2 tive law, as separately amended by chapters 382 and 397 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (c) the state's major creeks comprised of the 18 Mile Creek located in 5 Erie county, Chittenango Creek, Bash Bish and Kinderhook Creek located 6 in Columbia county, Kinderhook Creek located in Rensselaer county, Bash- 7 er Kill, Bushkill, Cattaraugus, Cayadutta, North Chuctanunda, Cincinna- 8 ti, East Kill, Esopus (including upper and lower branches), Ferguson, 9 Fish (including east and west branches), Gooseberry, Great Valley, 10 Kennyetto, Little Sandy, Moyer, Mud Creek located in Oneida county, 11 Ninemile Creek, Onondaga, Oriskany, Peekskill Hollow, Reall, Roeliff 12 Jansen Kill, Rondout, Salmon (in Monroe county), Sandy, Sauquoit, Scho- 13 harie, Shawangunk Kill, Six Mile Creek, South Sandy, Oatka, Tonawanda, 14 West Kill, Scajaquada, Wappinger, Webatuck, Wassaic, Willsey in the 15 village of Wurtsboro, Wood Creek located in Herkimer county, Wood Creek 16 located in Oneida county, Black Creek located in Monroe county, Black 17 Creek located in Genesee and Wyoming counties, Ellicott Creek located in 18 Erie county, Wynantskill, Claverack, Taghkanic, Agawamuck, Wyomanock, 19 and Ley Creek and Butternut Creek located in Onondaga county, Nanticoke 20 and Sawkill (in Ulster county), Saw Kill and Fall Kill located in Dutch- 21 ess county, Otter Kill Creek located in Orange county, Black Meadow 22 Creek located in Orange county, and the Silver Lake Outlet located in 23 Wyoming county; 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13437-01-5